Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 9
PAPER BALLOTS

1-13.5-901. Ballot boxes.

The governing body of each local government using paper ballots shall provide at least one ballot box for each polling place. Each ballot box shall be strongly constructed so as to prevent tampering, with a small opening at the top and with a lid to be locked. The ballot boxes and keys or seals shall be kept by the designated election official and delivered to the election judges within one day immediately preceding any local government election, to be returned as provided in section 1-13.5-614. Nothing in this section prevents the governing body from obtaining ballot boxes from the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 35, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-902. Ballots and sample ballots - delivery - format.

The designated election official of each local government using paper ballots shall provide printed ballots for the local government election. The official ballots shall be printed and in the possession of the designated election official at least thirty days before the election.

In addition to the requirements of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), sample ballots must be printed in the form of the official ballots and are subject to public inspection. The sample ballots must be printed upon paper of a different color from the official ballots. Sample ballots must be delivered to the election judges and posted with the instruction cards provided under section 1-13.5-906.

Every ballot must contain the names of all duly nominated candidates for the offices to be voted for at that election, except those who have died or withdrawn, and the ballot must contain no other names. The names of the candidates for each office must be printed on the ballot without political party designation and without any title or degree designating the business or profession of the candidate. The names must be arranged by lot by the designated election official at any time prior to the certification of the ballot. The designated election official shall notify the candidates of the time and place of the lot drawing.

The ballots must be printed so as to give to each eligible elector a clear opportunity to designate his or her choice of candidates, ballot issues, and ballot questions by a mark as instructed. Words may be printed on the ballot that will aid the elector, such as "vote for not more than one".

At the end of the list of candidates for each different office, there must be one or more blank spaces in which the elector may write the name of any eligible person not printed on the ballot who has filed an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate pursuant to section 1-13.5-305. The number of spaces provided shall be the lesser of the number of eligible electors who have properly filed an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate or the number of persons to be elected to the office. No such blank spaces shall be provided if no eligible person properly filed an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate.

The names of the candidates for each office must be arranged under the designation of the office. The designated election official shall not print, in connection with any name, any title or degree designating the business or profession of the candidate. Each candidate's name may include one nickname if the candidate regularly uses the nickname and the nickname does not include any part of a political party name.

If no candidate is duly nominated and no person properly files an affidavit of intent to be a write-in candidate for an office, the following text must appear under the designation of the office: "There are no candidates for this office".

Whenever the approval of a ballot issue or ballot question is submitted to the vote of the people, the ballot issue or question must be printed on the ballot following the lists of candidates. Ballot issues and ballot questions must be listed in the following order, as applicable: Issues to increase taxes, issues to increase debt, citizen petitions, and other referred measures.

The ballot issue or question must be identified by the name of the local government submitting the ballot issue or question followed by a letter.

The extreme top part of each ballot must be divided by two perforated or dotted lines into two spaces, each of which must be not less than one inch in width, the top portion being known as the stub and the next portion as the duplicate stub. Upon each of said stubs nothing is to be printed except the number of the ballot, and the same number must be printed on both stubs. Stubs and duplicate stubs of ballots must both be numbered consecutively. There must be printed on the stub of an absentee ballot "Absentee Ballot Number [...]", and such stubs must be numbered consecutively beginning with number one. All ballots must be uniform and of sufficient length and width to allow for the names of candidates and the proposed questions to be printed in clear, plain type with a space of at least one-half inch between the different columns on said ballot. On each ballot must be printed the endorsement "official ballot for . . .", and after the word "for" must follow the designation of the local government for which the ballot is prepared, the date of the election, and a facsimile of the signature of the designated election official. The ballot shall not contain any caption or other endorsement or number. Each designated election official shall use precisely the same quality and tint of paper, the same kind of type, and the same quality and tint of plain black ink for all ballots furnished by the designated election official at one election.

A duplicate stub is not required for a ballot that is prepared for an independent mail ballot election pursuant to part 11 of this article.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 35, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

(8) amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1268, § 8, effective August 10.

1-13.5-903. Correction of errors.

The designated election official shall correct, without delay, any errors in publication or in sample or official ballots that are discovered or brought to the official's attention and that can be corrected without interfering with the timely distribution of the ballots.

If it appears by verified petition of a candidate or the candidate's agent submitted to any district court that an error or omission occurred in the publication of the names or description of the candidates or in the printing of sample or official election ballots and the error has been brought to the attention of the designated election official and not been corrected, the court shall issue an order requiring the designated election official to correct the error immediately or to show cause why the error should not be corrected. Costs, including reasonable attorney fees, may be assessed in the discretion of the court against either party.

If, before the date set for election, a duly nominated candidate withdraws by filing an affidavit of withdrawal with the designated election official, or dies and the fact of the death becomes known to the designated election official before the ballots are printed, the name of the candidate will not be printed on the ballots. If the ballots are already printed, the votes cast for the withdrawn or deceased candidate are invalid and will not be counted.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 36, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-904. Printing and distribution of ballots.

In local government elections in which paper ballots are used, the designated election official shall cause to be printed or copied and distributed to the election judges in each respective polling place a sufficient number of ballots. The ballots shall be sent in one or more sealed packages for each polling place, with marks on the outside of each clearly stating the polling place for which it is intended and the number of ballots enclosed. The packages must be delivered to one of the election judges of each polling place no later than the day before the election. The election judge who receives the ballots thus delivered shall give receipt for them, which receipt must be filed with the designated election official, who shall also keep a record of the time and manner in which each of said packages was sent and delivered. The election judge receiving the package shall produce the same, with the seal unbroken, in the proper polling place at the opening of the polls on election day and, in the presence of all election judges for the polling place, shall open the package.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 37, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-905. Substitute ballots.

If the ballots to be furnished to any election judge are not delivered by 8 p.m. on the day before election day, or if after delivery they are destroyed or stolen, the designated election official shall see that other ballots are prepared, as nearly in the form prescribed as practicable, with the word "substitute" printed in brackets immediately under the facsimile signature of the designated election official. Upon receipt of the substitute ballots, accompanied by a written and sworn statement of the designated election official that the same have been so prepared and furnished by him or her and that the original ballots were not received or were destroyed or stolen, the election judges shall use the substitute ballots at the election. If for any cause none of the official ballots or substitute ballots prepared by the designated election official are ready for distribution at any polling place, or if the supply of ballots is exhausted before the polls are closed, unofficial ballots, printed or written, made as nearly as possible in the form of the official ballots, may be used until substitutes prepared by the designated election official are printed and delivered.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 37, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-906. Instruction cards - content.

The designated election official shall furnish to the election judges of each polling place a sufficient number of instruction cards to guide electors in preparing their ballots. The election judges shall post at least one card in each polling place on the day of the election. Such cards shall be printed in large, clear type and contain full instructions to the electors about how to:

Obtain ballots for voting;

Prepare the ballot for deposit in the ballot box;

Obtain a new ballot in the place of one spoiled by accident or mistake; and

Obtain assistance in marking ballots.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 38, § 6, effective February 18.